Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the  Department of Education, for the biennium
beginning July 1,  2021, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following
purposes:
(1) Operations.............................  $ 107,368,314
(2) Oregon School for the Deaf .. $ 14,315,702
SECTION 2. There are appropriated to the  Department of Education, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2021, out  of the General Fund, the following amounts, which are to be dis-
tributed as grants-in-aid, for program costs and to purchase  services, for the following pur-
poses:
(1) Early intervention services
and early childhood special
education programs .............. $ 216,112,910
(2) Other special education
programs............................... $ 64,538,611
(3) Other K-12 grant-in-aid
programs............................... $ 63,730,129
(4) Oregon prekindergarten
program ................................ $ 163,141,727
(5) Other early learning
programs............................... $ 113,400,753
(6) Youth development programs $ 14,707,168
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding ORS 327.856, there is appropriated to the  Department of
Education, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of
$174,618,343 for deposit in the High School  Graduation and College and Career Readiness
Fund.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated to  the Department of Education, for the biennium
beginning July 1,  2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $48,238,961 for debt service
on general obligation bonds.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5513 (SB 5513-A) Page 1
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses, other than  expenses described in sections 6 and 14 of this 2021 Act, from fees,
moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding  lottery funds,
corporate activity tax funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the Department of
Education, for the following purposes:
(1) Capital bonding..................... $ 150,000,000
(2) Operations............................. $ 61,315,968
(3) Oregon School for the Deaf .. $ 6,598,468
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for  payment
of grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services from fees, moneys or  other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding  lottery funds, corporate activity tax funds
and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Education for  programs other
than those specified in sections 5 and 14 of this 2021 Act, for the following purposes:
(1) Early learning programs ....... $ 12,360,701
(2) Youth development programs $ 6,331,117
(3) Educator Advancement
Council.................................. $ 50,375,000
(4) All other grants .................... $ 399,988,681
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds, other than those described in sections 8 and 14 of this  2021
Act, collected or received by the Department of Education, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations............................. $ 156,608,600
(2) Oregon School for the Deaf .. $ 329,420
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services from federal funds, other than  those
described in sections 7 and 14 of this  2021 Act, received by the Department of Education, for
the following purposes:
(1) Early learning programs ....... $ 210,204,580
(2) Youth development programs $ 1,255,179
(3) Early learning COVID-19
related grants ....................... $ 473,755,776
(4) K-12 COVID-19 related
grants.................................... $ 1,202,777,506
(5) All other grants .................... $ 898,952,162
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$892,276,973 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the  maximum limit for
payments of grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services by the Department of Ed-
ucation from the Student Investment Account established under ORS 327.175.
SECTION 10.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for  payments
of grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services  by the Department of Education from
the Early Learning Account established under ORS 327.269, for the following purposes:
(1) Early intervention services
and early childhood special
education programs .............. $ 83,800,510
(2) Other early learning
programs............................... $ 348,136,610
Enrolled Senate Bill 5513 (SB 5513-A) Page 2
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$4,169,563 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Department of Education from the Early Learning  Account es-
tablished under ORS 327.269 for operations.
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for  payments
of grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services  by the Department of Education from
the Statewide Education Initiatives Account  established under ORS 327.250, for the following
purposes:
(1) High School Graduation and
College and Career
Readiness Fund..................... $ 136,682,685
(2) Reengagement program ........ $ 8,344,000
(3) Statewide equity initiatives... $ 22,688,000
(4) All other grants .................... $ 167,230,199
SECTION 13.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$35,956,536 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of Education from the Statewide Education  Initi-
atives Account established under ORS 327.250 for operations.
SECTION 14. For the biennium beginning July  1, 2021, the following expenditures by the
Department of Education are not limited:
(1) Moneys  from the School Lunch Revolving Account, Education Training Revolving
Account and Common School Fund; and
(2) Expenditures for grants-in-aid and purchased services from federal funds received  by
the Department of Education from the United States Department of Agriculture.
SECTION 15. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by Senate June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5513 (SB 5513-A) Page 3